Massachusetts, session 194th, S1342.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general rule to the contrary, any private railroad company or its
agents, contractors, subcontractors, vendors, sub-vendors, secondary vendors or subcarriers; and
the rail and transit division of the department of transportation, under contract to provide rail
service through the commonwealth, shall comply with the minimum earned sick leave standards
set forth within section 148c of chapter 149.
of 1